District of Columbia statutes.
4-212.03

Protective payments on behalf of adult recipients.

(a)

The Mayor may authorize protective payments on behalf of adult recipients of public assistance under the following conditions:

(1)

When there has been made clear determination that a needy individual has, by reason of physical or mental impairment, such inability to manage funds that making payments to him would be contrary to his or her welfare, as evidenced by his or her repeated failure to pay for rent and other essentials, exploitation of him or her in money matters by other persons, and medical or psychological reports indicating severe intellectual disability, disorientation, or memory loss; and

(2)

When the individual selected as payee has shown an interest in and concern for the welfare of the recipient, is accessible to the recipient, has the ability to establish and maintain a positive friendly relationship with the recipient, and is dependable and able to use the assistance payment in the best interests of the recipient. Members of the staff of the Mayor or persons whose selection might create a conflict of interest, such as grocers or landlords, shall not be selected as payees.

(b)

The adult recipient shall be given the opportunity for a fair hearing with respect to any decision to make or continue protective payments or the selection of the payee.

(c)

The Mayor will undertake and continue special efforts to improve, to the extent possible, the recipient’s capacity for self-care and his or her ability to manage funds.

(d)

Reconsideration of the need for protective payments shall be made as indicated by the recipient’s circumstances and, in any event, at least every 6 months.

(e)

The Mayor shall initiate court proceedings for the judicial appointment of a guardian or other legal representative whenever it appears that such an appointment will best serve the interests of the recipient.

(f)

The Mayor shall authorize protective payments only when the Mayor can meet total need for all cases based on the current standards for requirements.

(g)

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1203, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(x), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(rrr), 46 DCR 905
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 9, 59 DCR 5567

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-212.3.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “severe intellectual disability” for “severe mental retardation” in (a)(1).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(x) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(rrr) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 701(x) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 701(x) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(rrr) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(rrr) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(rrr) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(rrr) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.